Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 4
WATER AND SANITATION DISTRICTS

Section

PART 1 WATER AND SANITATION DISTRICTS

PART 2 DOMESTIC WATERWORKS DISTRICT:
UNINCORPORATED TERRITORY
(1913 ACT)

PART 3 DOMESTIC WATERWORKS DISTRICT -
CITIES OF 10,000 OR MORE

PART 4 METROPOLITAN WATER DISTRICTS

PART 5 METROPOLITAN SEWAGE
DISPOSAL DISTRICTS